District of Columbia statutes.
32-1411

Application of subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to any person, firm, corporation, or craft in the District of Columbia which has voluntarily elected to conform with its provisions.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 207, ch. 267, § 11
1981 Ed., § 36-413.
1973 Ed., § 36-131.